Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2324
Act; how construed.

Nothing in the Domesticated Cervine Animal Act shall be construed to authorize any person to import, own, or possess any species of cervine animal the importation or possession of which is prohibited under section 37-524 and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.

Laws 2002, LB 1003, § 39.